Hawaii, session 2026, HB1978.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  The legislature finds that the West Hawaii community is in need of a new hospital in North Kona.  The legislature further finds that, pursuant to a needs assessment that was completed in 2024, "a growing community such as the one in [the North Kona region] can support a thriving hospital, expanded services, and integrated medical group" and that establishing a new hospital would provide more convenient access to critical services and shorten travel times, resulting in improved health outcomes for the region. The legislature additionally finds that a new hospital in North Kona will help with recruiting physicians to the island of Hawaii, which will help address the island's ongoing struggles with physician shortages.  The new hospital will also create new jobs and opportunities for the growing West Hawaii region. The legislature also finds that The Queen's Health Systems and the West Hawaii region of the Hawaii health systems corporation recently signed a memorandum of understanding to develop an outpatient care center in Kona, which will include office space and clinical services.  Once this outpatient care center is completed, with state funding, The Queen's Health Systems has committed to building a new adjacent hospital. Accordingly, the purpose of this Act is to appropriate funds for the plans, design, and construction of a new outpatient care center in North Kona. SECTION 2.  There is appropriated out of the general revenues of the State of Hawaii the sum of $50,000,000 or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2026-2027 for the planning, design, site work, and construction of a new outpatient care center in North Kona. The sum appropriated shall be expended by the Hawaii health systems corporation for the purposes of this Act. SECTION 3.  This Act shall take effect on July 1, 2026. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________